Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3050.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [93.5141] SAFE STORAGE OF REACTIVE MINE WASTE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Goals. new text end new text begin Reactive mine waste must be mined, disposed of, and reclaimed to prevent the release of substances that result in adverse impacts on natural resources by meeting the applicable water quality standards. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Applicable water quality standards" means the federal, state, local, or Tribal water quality standards that directly govern the water into which a discharge occurs. new text end new text begin (c) "Reactive mine waste" means waste that is shown through characterization studies or other means to cause a sustained net decrease in pH of at least 0.5 standard pH units in contact water due to a chemical interaction between sulfur-bearing minerals and oxygen. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Requirements. new text end new text begin A nonferrous metallic minerals mining operation must meet the following requirements: new text end new text begin (1) chemical and physical characterization of mine waste must be conducted before an application for a permit to mine is submitted and continuously during the process of mining, according to Minnesota Rules, part 6132.1000; and new text end new text begin (2) to comply with applicable water quality standards during construction and at closure, a reactive mine waste storage facility must be designed by professional engineers who are registered in Minnesota and proficient in the design, construction, operation, and reclamation of facilities for storing reactive mine waste. The design may include but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (i) modifying the physical or chemical characteristics of the mine waste or storing it in an environment where the discharge meets applicable water quality standards; or new text end new text begin (ii) during construction to the extent practicable and at closure, providing for collecting and disposing of waters that drain from the mine waste in compliance with applicable water quality standards. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Rules, part 6132.2200, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Rule: 25-04935 6132.2200 REACTIVE MINE WASTE. § Subpart 1. Goals. Reactive mine waste shall be mined, disposed of, and reclaimed to prevent the release of substances that result in the adverse impacts on natural resources. § Subp. 2. Requirements. A mining operation must meet the requirements in items A to D. § A. Chemical and physical characterization of mine waste must be conducted before the submission of an application for a permit to mine and continuously after that during the process of mining under part 6132.1000. § B. A reactive mine waste storage facility must be designed by professional engineers registered in Minnesota proficient in the design, construction, operation, and reclamation of facilities for the storage of reactive mine waste, to either: § (1) modify the physical or chemical characteristics of the mine waste, or store it in an environment, such that the waste is no longer reactive; or § (2) during construction to the extent practicable, and at closure, permanently prevent substantially all water from moving through or over the mine waste and provide for the collection and disposal of any remaining residual waters that drain from the mine waste in compliance with federal and state standards. § C. The reactive mine waste storage facility design shall: § (1) describe all materials, construction, and operating performance specifications and limitations that must be maintained to ensure protection of natural resources; § (2) identify monitoring locations to ensure compliance with the design; and § (3) include a schedule for inspection of the reactive mine waste storage facility construction, operation, and reclamation including closure and postclosure maintenance, by the design engineers, to ensure compliance with the design. In the event the design engineers become unable to perform the inspections, the engineers shall be replaced by persons who meet the qualifications of part 6132.2200, subpart 2, item B, and that can demonstrate an understanding of the design and an ability to perform the necessary inspections. § D. The commissioner may allow variance from specific reclamation requirements of parts 6132.2100 and 6132.2300 to 6132.2700 if their use would inhibit designs necessary to meet the requirements of this part.